Illinois, session 104th, HB1806.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Wellness and Oversight for Psychological Resources Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to 7safeguard individuals seeking therapy or psychotherapy 8services by ensuring these services are delivered by 9qualified, licensed, or certified professionals. This Act is 10intended to protect consumers from unlicensed or unqualified 11providers, including unregulated artificial intelligence 12systems, while respecting individual choice and access to 13community-based and faith-based mental health support. 14    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:15    "Administrative support" means tasks performed to assist a 16licensed professional in the delivery of therapy or 17psychotherapy services that do not involve communication. 18"Administrative support" includes, but is not limited to, the 19following:20        (1) managing appointment scheduling and reminders;21        (2) processing billing and insurance claims; and22        (3) drafting general communications related to therapy   HB1806 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07364 AAS 17404 b1    logistics that do not include therapeutic advice.2    "Artificial intelligence" has the meaning given to that 3term in Section 2-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act.4    "Consent" means a clear, explicit affirmative act by an 5individual that: (i) unambiguously communicates the 6individual's express, freely given, informed, voluntary, 7specific, and unambiguous written agreement, including a 8written agreement provided by electronic means, and (ii) is 9revocable by the individual. "Consent" does not include an 10agreement that is obtained by the following:11        (1) the acceptance of a general or broad terms of use 12    agreement or a similar document that contains descriptions 13    of artificial intelligence along with other unrelated 14    information;15        (2) an individual hovering over, muting, pausing, or 16    closing a given piece of digital content; or17        (3) an agreement obtained through the use of deceptive 18    actions.19    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 20Professional Regulation.21    "Licensed professional" means an individual who holds a 22valid license issued by this State to provide therapy or 23psychotherapy services, including:24        (1) a licensed clinical psychologist;25        (2) a licensed clinical social worker;26        (3) a licensed social worker;  HB1806 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07364 AAS 17404 b1        (4) a licensed professional counselor;2        (5) a licensed clinical professional counselor;3        (6) a licensed marriage and family therapist;4        (7) a certified alcohol and other drug counselor 5    authorized to provide therapy or psychotherapy services;6        (8) a licensed professional music therapist;7        (9) a licensed advanced practice psychiatric nurse as 8    defined in Section 1-101.3 of the Mental Health and 9    Developmental Disabilities Code; and10        (10) any other professional authorized by this State 11    to provide therapy or psychotherapy services, except for a 12    physician.13    "Peer support" means services provided by individuals with 14lived experience of mental health conditions or recovery from 15substance use that are intended to offer encouragement, 16understanding, and guidance without clinical intervention.17    "Religious counseling" means counseling provided by clergy 18members, pastoral counselors, or other religious leaders 19acting within the scope of their religious duties if the 20services are explicitly faith-based and are not represented as 21clinical mental health services or therapy or psychotherapy 22services.23    "Supplementary support" means tasks performed to assist a 24licensed professional in the delivery of therapy or 25psychotherapy services that do not involve therapeutic 26communication and that are not administrative support.   HB1806 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07364 AAS 17404 b1"Supplementary support" includes, but is not limited to, the 2following:3        (1) preparing and maintaining client records, 4    including therapy notes;5        (2) analyzing anonymized data to track client progress 6    or identify trends, subject to review by a licensed 7    professional; and8        (3) identifying and organizing external resources or 9    referrals for client use.10    "Therapeutic communication" means any verbal, non-verbal, 11or written interaction conducted in a clinical or professional 12setting that is intended to diagnose, treat, or address an 13individual's mental, emotional, or behavioral health concerns. 14"Therapeutic communication" includes, but is not limited to:15        (1) direct interactions with clients for the purpose 16    of understanding or reflecting their thoughts, emotions, 17    or experiences;18        (2) providing guidance, therapeutic strategies, or 19    interventions designed to achieve mental health outcomes;20        (3) offering emotional support, reassurance, or 21    empathy in response to psychological or emotional 22    distress;23        (4) collaborating with clients to develop or modify 24    therapeutic goals or treatment plans; and25        (5) offering behavioral feedback intended to promote 26    psychological growth or address mental health conditions.  HB1806 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07364 AAS 17404 b1    "Therapy or psychotherapy services" means services 2provided to diagnose, treat, or improve an individual's mental 3health or behavioral health. "Therapy or psychotherapy 4services" does not include religious counseling or peer 5support. 6    Section 15. Permitted use of artificial intelligence.7    (a) As used in this Section, "permitted use of artificial 8intelligence" means the use of artificial intelligence tools 9or systems by a licensed professional to assist in providing 10administrative support or supplementary support in therapy or 11psychotherapy services where the licensed professional 12maintains full responsibility for all interactions, outputs, 13and data use associated with the system and satisfies the 14requirements of subsection (b).15    (b) No licensed professional shall be permitted to use 16artificial intelligence to assist in providing supplementary 17support in therapy or psychotherapy where the client's 18therapeutic session is recorded or transcribed unless:19        (1) the patient or the patient's legally authorized 20    representative is informed in writing of the following:21            (A) that artificial intelligence will be used; and22            (B) the specific purpose of the artificial 23        intelligence tool or system that will be used; and24        (2) the patient or the patient's legally authorized 25    representative provides consent to the use of artificial   HB1806 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07364 AAS 17404 b1    intelligence. 2    Section 20. Prohibition on unauthorized therapy services. 3    (a) An individual, corporation, or entity may not provide, 4advertise, or otherwise offer therapy or psychotherapy 5services, including through the use of Internet-based 6artificial intelligence, to the public in this State unless 7the therapy or psychotherapy services are conducted by an 8individual who is a licensed professional.9    (b) A licensed professional may use artificial 10intelligence only to the extent the use meets the requirements 11of Section 15. A licensed professional may not allow 12artificial intelligence to do any of the following:13        (1) make independent therapeutic decisions;14        (2) directly interact with clients in any form of 15    therapeutic communication;16        (3) generate therapeutic recommendations or treatment 17    plans without review and approval by the licensed 18    professional; or19        (4) detect emotions or mental states. 20    Section 25. Disclosure of records and communications. All 21records kept by a licensed professional and all communications 22between an individual seeking therapy or psychotherapy 23services and a licensed professional shall be confidential and 24shall not be disclosed except as required under the Mental   HB1806 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07364 AAS 17404 b1Health and Developmental Disabilities Confidentiality Act. 2    Section 30. Enforcement and penalties. 3    (a) Any individual, corporation, or entity found in 4violation of this Act shall pay a civil penalty to the 5Department in an amount not to exceed $10,000 per violation, 6as determined by the Department, with penalties assessed based 7on the degree of harm and the circumstances of the violation. 8The civil penalty shall be assessed by the Department after a 9hearing is held in accordance with Section 2105-100 of the 10Department of Professional Regulation Law of the Civil 11Administrative Code of Illinois. An individual, corporation, 12or entity found in violation of this Act shall pay the civil 13penalty within 60 days after the date of an order by the 14Department imposing the civil penalty. The order shall 15constitute a judgment and may be filed and executed in the same 16manner as any judgment from a court of record.17    (b) The Department shall have authority to investigate any 18actual, alleged, or suspected violation of this Act. 19    Section 35. Exceptions. This Act does not apply to the 20following:21        (1) religious counseling;22        (2) peer support; and23        (3) self-help materials and educational resources that 24    are available to the public and do not purport to offer   HB1806 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07364 AAS 17404 b1    therapy or psychotherapy services. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.